Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2.1. Commercial Dog Breeding Operations.

§ 3.2-6507.1.
Business license required.

No commercial dog breeder shall breed dogs in the Commonwealth without a valid business license issued by any locality, as applicable, where he maintains dogs for the purpose of commercial dog breeding.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.77:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Animal Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 185 (2009).

§ 3.2-6507.2.
Commercial dog breeding; requirements.

Commercial dog breeders shall:

Maintain no more than 50 dogs over the age of one year at any time for breeding purposes. However, a higher number of dogs may be allowed if approved by local ordinance after a public hearing. Any such ordinance may include additional requirements for commercial breeding operations;

Breed female dogs only: (i) after annual certification by a licensed veterinarian that the dog is in suitable health for breeding; (ii) after the dog has reached the age of 18 months; and (iii) if the dog has not yet reached the age of 8 years;

Dispose of dogs only by gift, sale, transfer, barter, or euthanasia by a licensed veterinarian;

Dispose of deceased dogs in accordance with §

3.2-6554

;

Dispose of dog waste in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations; and

Maintain accurate records for at least five years including:

The date on which a dog enters the operation;

The person from whom the animal was purchased or obtained, including the address and phone number of such person;

A description of the animal, including the species, color, breed, sex, and approximate age and weight;

Any tattoo, microchip number, or other identification number carried by or appearing on the animal;

Each date that puppies were born to such animal and the number of puppies;

All medical care and vaccinations provided to the animal, including certifications required by a licensed veterinarian under this chapter; and

The disposition of each animal and the date.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.77:2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Animal Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 185 (2009).

§ 3.2-6507.3.
Right of entry.

The Commissioner, the State Veterinarian or his assistant, any animal control officer, and any public health or safety official employed by the locality where a commercial dog breeder resides or maintains breeding operations may, upon receiving a complaint or upon his own motion, investigate any violation of the provisions of this chapter. Such investigation may include (i) the inspection of the books and records of any commercial dog breeder, (ii) the inspection of any companion animal owned by the commercial dog breeder, and (iii) the inspection of any place where animals are bred or maintained. In conducting the inspection, the Commissioner or animal control officer may enter any premises where animals may be bred or maintained during daytime hours.

Any commercial dog breeder who is the subject of an investigation by the Commissioner, the State Veterinarian, or an animal control officer shall, upon request, provide assistance to the Commissioner, the State Veterinarian, or the animal control officer in making any inspection authorized by this section.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.77:3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”

§ 3.2-6507.4.
Concurrent operation of releasing agency prohibited.

It is unlawful for a commercial dog breeder to operate or maintain a controlling interest in any releasing agency.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.77:4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”

§ 3.2-6507.5.
Penalty.

Any commercial dog breeder violating any provision of this article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.77:5.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”

§ 3.2-6507.6.
Duty of attorneys for the Commonwealth.

It shall be the duty of each attorney for the Commonwealth to enforce this article.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.77:6.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”